src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Traveller Romani language nouns inflect in number and definiteness

!! **TODO:** The lexica *m1 - m4* may be unified and their inflection 
!! differences handled in twolc. *f1, f2* and *n* have different suffixes
!! and should be kept.

LEXICON mx
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for uninflected (for now)
+N: # ;

LEXICON f1m2
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** split in two
m2 ;
f1 ;

LEXICON f1m1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** split  in two
f1 ;
m1 ;

LEXICON f
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** goes to f2
f2 ;

LEXICON pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** with no gender info
+N+Pl: # ;

LEXICON m1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>n # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON m1pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pl only
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON m2
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON m3
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>n # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>r # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>ne # ;

LEXICON m4
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>n # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON f1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON f2
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON n
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def:%>e # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Def:%>ane # ; ! xxx Rolf blattnane



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
